lib/D-Type/files/hyphendict/es.hyp
HYPHENDICT-UTF8
!LANGUAGE=Spanish
!CHR_UPPER=ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÁÉÍÑÓÚ
!CHR_LOWER=abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzáéíñóú
!BGN_MIN_CHARS=1
!END_MIN_CHARS=1
!HYPHENDICTDATA
1ñ
1b
2bb
2bc
2bd
2bf
2bg
2b1h
2bj
2bk
b2l
2bl.
2bm
2bn
2bp
2bq
b2r
2br.
2bs
2bt
2bv
2bx
2by
2bz
1c
2cb
2cc
2cd
2cf
2cg
c4h
2cj
c2k
c2l
2cl.
2cm
2cn
2cp
2cq
c2r
2cr.
2cs
2ct
2cv
2cx
2cy
2cz
1d
2db
2dc
2dd
2df
2dg
2d1h
2dj
2dk
2dl
2dm
2dn
2dp
2dq
d2r
2dr.
2ds
2dt
2dv
2dx
2dy
2dz
1f
2fb
2fc
2fd
2ff
2fg
2f1h
2fj
2fk
f2l
2fl.
2fm
2fn
2fp
2fq
f2r
2fr.
2fs
2ft
2fv
2fx
2fy
2fz
1g
2gb
2gc
2gd
2gf
2gg
2g2h
2gj
2gk
g2l
2gl.
2gm
2gn
2gp
2gq
g2r
2gr.
2gs
2gt
2gv
2gx
2gy
2gz
2hb
2hc
2hd
2hf
2hg
2h1h
2hj
2hk
2hl
2hm
2hn
2hp
2hq
2hr
2hs
2ht
2hv
2hx
2hy
2hz
1j
2jb
2jc
2jd
2jf
2jg
2j1h
2jj
2jk
2jl
2jm
2jn
2jp
2jq
2jr
2js
2jt
2jv
2jx
2jy
2jz
1k
2kb
2kc
2kd
2kf
2kg
2k2h
2kj
2kk
k2l
2kl.
2km
2kn
2kp
2kq
k2r
2kr.
2ks
2kt
2kv
2kx
2ky
2kz
1l
2lb
2lc
2ld
2lf
2lg
2l1h
2lj
2lk
l4l
2ll.
2lm
2ln
2lp
2lq
2lr
2ls
2lt
2lv
2lx
2ly
2lz
1m
2mb
2mc
2md
2mf
2mg
2m1h
2mj
2mk
2ml
2mm
2mn
2mp
2mq
2mr
2ms
2mt
2mv
2mx
2my
2mz
1n
2nb
2nc
2nd
2nf
2ng
2n1h
2nj
2nk
2nl
2nm
2nn
2np
2nq
2nr
2ns
2nt
2nv
2nx
2ny
2nz
1p
2pb
2pc
2pd
2pf
2pg
2p1h
2pj
2pk
p2l
2pl.
2pm
2pn
2pp
2pq
p2r
2pr.
2ps
2pt
2pv
2px
2py
2pz
1q
2qb
2qc
2qd
2qf
2qg
2q1h
2qj
2qk
2ql
2qm
2qn
2qp
2qq
2qr
2qs
2qt
2qv
2qx
2qy
2qz
1r
2rb
2rc
2rd
2rf
2rg
2r1h
2rj
2rk
2rl
2rm
2rn
2rp
2rq
r2r
2rr.
2rs
2rt
2rv
2rx
2ry
2rz
1s
2sb
2sc
2sd
2sf
2sg
2s1h
2sj
2sk
2sl
2sm
2sn
2sp
2sq
2sr
2ss
2st
2sv
2sx
2sy
2sz
1t
2tb
2tc
2td
2tf
2tg
2t1h
2tj
2tk
2tm
2tn
2tp
2tq
t2r
2tr.
2ts
2tt
2tv
t2x
2ty
2tz
1v
2vb
2vc
2vd
2vf
2vg
2v1h
2vj
2vk
v2l
2vl.
2vm
2vn
2vp
2vq
v2r
2vr.
2vs
2vt
2vv
2vx
2vy
2vz
4w
1x
2xb
2xc
2xd
2xf
2xg
2x1h
2xj
2xk
2xl
2xm
2xn
2xp
2xq
2xr
2xs
2xt
2xv
2xx
2xy
2xz
1y
2yb
2yc
2yd
2yf
2yg
2y1h
2yj
2yk
2yl
2ym
2yn
2yp
2yq
2yr
2ys
2yt
2yv
2yx
2yy
2yz
1z
2zb
2zc
2zd
2zf
2zg
2z1h
2zj
2zk
2zl
2zm
2zn
2zp
2zq
2zr
2zs
2zt
2zv
2zx
2zy
2zz
2t2l
2no.
.no2
4caca4
4cago4
4caga4
4cagas.
4teta.
4tetas.
4puta4
4puto4
.hu4mea
.hu4meo
.he4mee
4meo.
4meable.
4meables.
4pedo4
4culo4
a4i3go
a4es
a4e3mos
a4éis
a4en
a4ías
a4ía
a4ía3mos
a4íais
a4ían
a4eré
a4e3rás
a4e3rá
a4e3remos
a4e3réis
a4e3rán
a4i3ga
a4ai3gan
a4e3ría
a4edme
a4edl
a4eos
4er.
a4erme
a4érme
a4erte
a4érte
a4erle
a4erse
a4érse
a4erlo
a4erla
a4ernos
a4érnos
a4eros
4ído.
4ída.
4ídos.
4ídas.
4as
4amos
4áis
4an
4ásteis
4aron
4aré
4ará
4ara
4áramos
4árais
4aran
4are
4áremos
4áreis
4aren
4adme
4adl
4aos
4ar.
4arme
4árme
4arte
4árte
4arle
4arse
4árse
4arlo
4arla
4arnos
4árnos
4aros
4ado.
4ada.
4ados.
4adas.
acto1a2
acto1e2
acto1i2
acto1o2
acto1u2
acto1h
acto1á2
acto1é2
acto1í2
acto1ó2
acto1ú2
afro1a2
afro1e2
afro1i2
afro1o2
afro1u2
afro1h
afro1á2
afro1é2
afro1í2
afro1ó2
afro1ú2
.a2
.an2a2
.an2e2
.an2i2
.an2o4
.an2u2
.an2á2
.an2é2
.an2í2
.an2ó2
.an2ú2
.ana3lí
.aná3li
.ana3li
.an3aero
.an3e2pigr
.an3h
.an3i2so
.anua3l
.anu3bl
.anu3da
.anu3l
aero1a2
aero1e2
aero1i2
aero1o2
aero1u2
aero1h
aero1á2
aero1é2
aero1í2
aero1ó2
aero1ú2
anfi1a2
anfi1e2
anfi1i2
anfi1o2
anfi1u2
anfi1h
anfi1á2
anfi1é2
anfi1í2
anfi1ó2
anfi1ú2
anglo1a2
anglo1e2
anglo1i2
anglo1o2
anglo1u2
anglo1h
anglo1á2
anglo1é2
anglo1í2
anglo1ó2
anglo1ú2
ante1a2
ante1e2
ante1i2
ante1o2
ante1u2
ante1h
ante1á2
ante1é2
ante1í2
ante1ó2
ante1ú2
.ante2o3je
.anti1a2
.anti1e2
.anti1i2
.anti1o2
.anti1u2
.anti1h
.anti1á2
.anti1é2
.anti1í2
.anti1ó2
.anti1ú2
ti2o3qu
ti2o3co
archi1a2
archi1e2
archi1i2
archi1o2
archi1u2
archi1h
archi1á2
archi1é2
archi1í2
archi1ó2
archi1ú2
auto1a2
auto1e2
auto1i2
auto1o2
auto1u2
auto1h
auto1á2
auto1é2
auto1í2
auto1ó2
auto1ú2
biblio1a2
biblio1e2
biblio1i2
biblio1o2
biblio1u2
biblio1h
biblio1á2
biblio1é2
biblio1í2
biblio1ó2
biblio1ú2
bio1a2
bio1e2
bio1i2
bio1o2
bio1u2
bio1h
bio1á2
bio1é2
bio1í2
bio1ó2
bio1ú2
bi1u2ní
cardio1a2
cardio1e2
cardio1i2
cardio1o2
cardio1u2
cardio1h
cardio1á2
cardio1é2
cardio1í2
cardio1ó2
cardio1ú2
cefalo1a2
cefalo1e2
cefalo1i2
cefalo1o2
cefalo1u2
cefalo1h
cefalo1á2
cefalo1é2
cefalo1í2
cefalo1ó2
cefalo1ú2
centi1a2
centi1e2
centi1i2
centi1o2
centi1u2
centi1h
centi1á2
centi1é2
centi1í2
centi1ó2
centi1ú2
ciclo1a2
ciclo1e2
ciclo1i2
ciclo1o2
ciclo1u2
ciclo1h
ciclo1á2
ciclo1é2
ciclo1í2
ciclo1ó2
ciclo1ú2
cito1a2
cito1e2
cito1i2
cito1o2
cito1u2
cito1h
cito1á2
cito1é2
cito1í2
cito1ó2
cito1ú2
3c2neor
cnico1a2
cnico1e2
cnico1i2
cnico1o2
cnico1u2
cnico1h
cnico1á2
cnico1é2
cnico1í2
cnico1ó2
cnico1ú2
.co1a2
.co1e2
.co1i2
.co1o2
.co1u2
.co1h
.co1á2
.co1é2
.co1í2
.co1ó2
.co1ú2
.co2
co4á3gul
co4acci
co4acti
co4adju
co4a3dun
co4adyu
co4a3gul
co4a3lic
co4aptac
co4art
co4árt
co4e3fic
co4erc
co4e3tá
co4imbr
co4inci
co4i3to
co4o3per
co4o3pér
co4opt
co4ord
con1imbr
con1urb
cripto1a2
cripto1e2
cripto1i2
cripto1o2
cripto1u2
cripto1h
cripto1á2
cripto1é2
cripto1í2
cripto1ó2
cripto1ú2
crono1a2
crono1e2
crono1i2
crono1o2
crono1u2
crono1h
crono1á2
crono1é2
crono1í2
crono1ó2
crono1ú2
contra1a2
contra1e2
contra1i2
contra1o2
contra1u2
contra1h
contra1á2
contra1é2
contra1í2
contra1ó2
contra1ú2
deca1a2
deca1e2
deca1i2
deca1o2
deca1u2
deca1h
deca1á2
deca1é2
deca1í2
deca1ó2
deca1ú2
4e3dro.
4e3dros.
4é3drico.
4é3dricos.
4é3drica.
4é3dricas.
deca2i3mient
decimo1
.des1a2
.des1e2
.des1i2
.des1o2
.des1u2
.des1á2
.des1é2
.des1í2
.des1ó2
.des1ú2
des2a2
des2e2
3sa.
3sas.
de2s3órde
de2s3orde
de2s3abast
de2s3aboll
de2s3aboto
de2s3abr
desa3brid
de2s3abroch
de2s3aceit
de2s3aceler
desa3cert
desa3ciert
de2s3acobar
de2s3acomod
de2s3acomp
de2s3acons
de2s3acopl
de2s3acorr
de2s3acostum
de2s3acot
desa3craliz
desa3credit
de2s3activ
de2s3aderez
de2s3adeud
de2s3adorar
de2s3adormec
de2s3adorn
de2s3advert
desa3fí
de2s3aferr
desa3fi
de2s3afic
de2s3afil
de2s3afin
de2s3afor
desa3gü
desa3garr
de2s3agraci
desa3grad
de2s3agravi
de2s3agreg
de2s3agrup
de2s3agu
desa3guisado
de2s3aherr
de2s3ahij
de2s3ajust
de2s3alagar
de2s3alent
de2s3alfom
de2s3alfor
de2s3aliñ
desa3lin
de2s3alien
de2s3aline
desa3liv
de2s3alm
de2s3almid
desa3loj
de2s3alquil
de2s3alter
de2s3alumbr
desa3marr
desa3mobl
de2s3amold
de2s3amort
de2s3amuebl
de2s3and
de2s3angel
de2s3anid
de2s3anim
de2s3aním
de2s3anud
desa3pañ
desa3pacib
de2s3apadr
de2s3apare
desa3parec
desa3paric
desa3peg
desa3percib
de2s3aplic
de2s3apolill
de2s3apoy
desa3prens
de2s3apret
de2s3apriet
de2s3aprob
de2s3apropi
de2s3aprovech
de2s3arbol
de2s3aren
de2s3arm
des4arme
de2s3arraig
de2s3arregl
de2s3arrend
de2s3arrim
desa3rroll
de2s3arrop
de2s3arrug
de2s3articul
de2s3asent
de2s3asist
de2s3asn
desa3soseg
desa3sosieg
de2s3atenc
de2s3atend
de2s3atiend
de2s3atent
desa3tin
de2s3atorn
de2s3atranc
de2s3autor
de2s3avis
desa3yun
desa3zón
desa3zon
de2s3embal
de2s3embál
de2s3embar
de2s3embár
de2s3embarg
de2s3embols
de2s3emborr
de2s3embosc
de2s3embot
de2s3embrag
de2s3embrág
de2s3embrave
de2s3embráve
de2s3embroll
de2s3embróll
de2s3embruj
de2s3embrúj
de3semej
de2s3empañ
de2s3empáñ
de2s3empac
de2s3empaquet
de2s3empaquét
de2s3emparej
de2s3emparéj
de2s3emparent
de2s3empat
de2s3empé
de2s3empedr
de2s3empeg
de2s3empeor
de2s3emperez
de2s3empern
de2s3emple
de2s3empolv
de2s3empotr
de2s3empoz
de2s3enam
de2s3encab
de2s3encad
de2s3encaj
de2s3encáj
de2s3encall
de2s3encáll
de2s3encam
de3sencant
de2s3encap
de2s3encar
de2s3encár
de2s3ench
de2s3encl
de2s3enco
de2s3encr
de2s3encu
de2s3end
de3senfad
de3senfád
de2s3enfi
de2s3enfo
de2s3enfó
de3senfren
de2s3enfund
de2s3enfur
de3sengañ
de3sengáñ
de2s3enganch
de2s3engar
de2s3engas
de2s3engom
de2s3engoz
de2s3engra
de2s3enhebr
de2s3enj
de2s3enlad
de2s3enlaz
de2s3enlo
de2s3enm
de2s3enr
de2s3ens
de2s3enta
de3sentend
de3sentien
de3sentién
de2s3enter
de2s3entier
de2s3entiér
de2s3ento
de2s3entr
de2s3entu
de2s3envain
de3senvolvim
de3seo
de2s3eq
de3serci
de3sert
de2s3espa
de3sesperac
de2s3esperanz
de3sesper
de2s3estabil
de2s3estim
de3sider
de3sidia
de3sidio
de3siert
de3sign
de3sigual
de3silusi
de2s3imagin
de2s3iman
de2s3impon
de2s3impresX
de2s3incent
de2s3inclin
de2s3incorp
de2s3incrust
de3sinenc
de3sinfec
de2s3inflam
de2s3infl
de2s3inform
de2s3inhib
de2s3insect
de2s3instal
de3sintegr
de3sinter
de2s3intox
de2s3inver
de3sisten
de2s3obedec
de2s3oblig
de2s3obstr
de3socup
de2s3odor
de3solac
de3solad
de3soll
de3suell
de3sonce
.dieci1o2
dodeca1a2
dodeca1e2
dodeca1i2
dodeca1o2
dodeca1u2
dodeca1h
dodeca1á2
dodeca1é2
dodeca1í2
dodeca1ó2
dodeca1ú2
ecano1a2
ecano1e2
ecano1i2
ecano1o2
ecano1u2
ecano1h
ecano1á2
ecano1é2
ecano1í2
ecano1ó2
ecano1ú2
eco1a2
eco1e2
eco1i2
eco1o2
eco1u2
eco1h
eco1á2
eco1é2
eco1í2
eco1ó2
eco1ú2
ectro1a2
ectro1e2
ectro1i2
ectro1o2
ectro1u2
ectro1h
ectro1á2
ectro1é2
ectro1í2
ectro1ó2
ectro1ú2
endo1a2
endo1e2
endo1i2
endo1o2
endo1u2
endo1h
endo1á2
endo1é2
endo1í2
endo1ó2
endo1ú2
ento1a2
ento1e2
ento1i2
ento1o2
ento1u2
ento1h
ento1á2
ento1é2
ento1í2
ento1ó2
ento1ú2
entre1a2
entre1e2
entre1i2
entre1o2
entre1u2
entre1h
entre1á2
entre1é2
entre1í2
entre1ó2
entre1ú2
euco1a2
euco1e2
euco1i2
euco1o2
euco1u2
euco1h
euco1á2
euco1é2
euco1í2
euco1ó2
euco1ú2
euro1a2
euro1e2
euro1i2
euro1o2
euro1u2
euro1h
euro1á2
euro1é2
euro1í2
euro1ó2
euro1ú2
fono1a2
fono1e2
fono1i2
fono1o2
fono1u2
fono1h
fono1á2
fono1é2
fono1í2
fono1ó2
fono1ú2
foto1a2
foto1e2
foto1i2
foto1o2
foto1u2
foto1h
foto1á2
foto1é2
foto1í2
foto1ó2
foto1ú2
gastro1a2
gastro1e2
gastro1i2
gastro1o2
gastro1u2
gastro1h
gastro1á2
gastro1é2
gastro1í2
gastro1ó2
gastro1ú2
geo1a2
geo1e2
geo1i2
geo1o2
geo1u2
geo1h
geo1á2
geo1é2
geo1í2
geo1ó2
geo1ú2
gluco1a2
gluco1e2
gluco1i2
gluco1o2
gluco1u2
gluco1h
gluco1á2
gluco1é2
gluco1í2
gluco1ó2
gluco1ú2
hecto1a2
hecto1e2
hecto1i2
hecto1o2
hecto1u2
hecto1h
hecto1á2
hecto1é2
hecto1í2
hecto1ó2
hecto1ú2
helio1a2
helio1e2
helio1i2
helio1o2
helio1u2
helio1h
helio1á2
helio1é2
helio1í2
helio1ó2
helio1ú2
hemato1a2
hemato1e2
hemato1i2
hemato1o2
hemato1u2
hemato1h
hemato1á2
hemato1é2
hemato1í2
hemato1ó2
hemato1ú2
hemo1a2
hemo1e2
hemo1i2
hemo1o2
hemo1u2
hemo1h
hemo1á2
hemo1é2
hemo1í2
hemo1ó2
hemo1ú2
2al.
2ales.
hexa1a2
hexa1e2
hexa1i2
hexa1o2
hexa1u2
hexa1h
hexa1á2
hexa1é2
hexa1í2
hexa1ó2
hexa1ú2
hidro1a2
hidro1e2
hidro1i2
hidro1o2
hidro1u2
hidro1h
hidro1á2
hidro1é2
hidro1í2
hidro1ó2
hidro1ú2
hipe2r1a2
hipe2r1e2
hipe2r1i2
hipe2r1o2
hipe2r1u2
hipe2r3r
hipe2r1á2
hipe2r1é2
hipe2r1í2
hipe2r1ó2
hipe2r1ú2
per4emia
histo1a2
histo1e2
histo1i2
histo1o2
histo1u2
histo1h
histo1á2
histo1é2
histo1í2
histo1ó2
histo1ú2
homo1a2
homo1e2
homo1i2
homo1o2
homo1u2
homo1h
homo1á2
homo1é2
homo1í2
homo1ó2
homo1ú2
icono1a2
icono1e2
icono1i2
icono1o2
icono1u2
icono1h
icono1á2
icono1é2
icono1í2
icono1ó2
icono1ú2
infra1a2
infra1e2
infra1i2
infra1o2
infra1u2
infra1h
infra1á2
infra1é2
infra1í2
infra1ó2
infra1ú2
.inte2r1a2
.inte2r1e2
.inte2r1i2
.inte2r1o2
.inte2r1u2
.inte2r3r
.inte2r1á2
.inte2r1é2
.inte2r1í2
.inte2r1ó2
.inte2r1ú2
.in3ter2e3sa
.in3ter2e3se
.in3ter2e3so
.in3ter2e3sá
.in3ter2e3sé
.in3ter2e3só
.in3te2r3ino
.in3te2r3ina
.in3te2r3inidad
.in3te3r4rog
.in3te3r4rupc
.in3te3r4rupt
.in3te3r4rump
intra1a2
intra1e2
intra1i2
intra1o2
intra1u2
intra1h
intra1á2
intra1é2
intra1í2
intra1ó2
intra1ú2
iso1a2
iso1e2
iso1i2
iso1o2
iso1u2
iso1h
iso1á2
iso1é2
iso1í2
iso1ó2
iso1ú2
kilo1a2
kilo1e2
kilo1i2
kilo1o2
kilo1u2
kilo1h
kilo1á2
kilo1é2
kilo1í2
kilo1ó2
kilo1ú2
macro1a2
macro1e2
macro1i2
macro1o2
macro1u2
macro1h
macro1á2
macro1é2
macro1í2
macro1ó2
macro1ú2
mal2
ma4l3h
.ma4l3edu
bien2
bien3h
maxi1a2
maxi1e2
maxi1i2
maxi1o2
maxi1u2
maxi1h
maxi1á2
maxi1é2
maxi1í2
maxi1ó2
maxi1ú2
megalo1a2
megalo1e2
megalo1i2
megalo1o2
megalo1u2
megalo1h
megalo1á2
megalo1é2
megalo1í2
megalo1ó2
megalo1ú2
mega1a2
mega1e2
mega1i2
mega1o2
mega1u2
mega1h
mega1á2
mega1é2
mega1í2
mega1ó2
mega1ú2
micro1a2
micro1e2
micro1i2
micro1o2
micro1u2
micro1h
micro1á2
micro1é2
micro1í2
micro1ó2
micro1ú2
mini1a2
mini1e2
mini1i2
mini1o2
mini1u2
mini1h
mini1á2
mini1é2
mini1í2
mini1ó2
mini1ú2
2o.
2os.
2oso.
2osos.
multi1a2
multi1e2
multi1i2
multi1o2
multi1u2
multi1h
multi1á2
multi1é2
multi1í2
multi1ó2
multi1ú2
miria1a2
miria1e2
miria1i2
miria1o2
miria1u2
miria1h
miria1á2
miria1é2
miria1í2
miria1ó2
miria1ú2
mono1a2
mono1e2
mono1i2
mono1o2
mono1u2
mono1h
mono1á2
mono1é2
mono1í2
mono1ó2
mono1ú2
2ico.
2icos.
namo1a2
namo1e2
namo1i2
namo1o2
namo1u2
namo1h
namo1á2
namo1é2
namo1í2
namo1ó2
namo1ú2
necro1a2
